Missouri, session 2026, HB3150.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 643, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 643.365, to read as follows:
643.365. On or before January 1, 2028, the commission shall suspend operation
2 of any motor vehicle emissions inspection program established under sections 643.300 to
3 643.355.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.